test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-hakkama_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - hakkama: # Verb 'to start, begin' - full paradigm


# Isikulised olevikuvormid # Personal present forms

     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: hakkan
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: hakkad
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: hakkab
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: hakkame
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: hakkate
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: hakkavad
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: hakka

     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: hakkaksin
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: hakkaksid
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: hakkaks
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: hakkaksime
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: hakkaksite
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: hakkaksid

     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: hakka
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: hakaku
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: hakakem
     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: hakake

     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: hakkavat

# Isikulised minevikuvormid # Personal past forms

     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Sg1+Aff: hakkasin
     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Sg2+Aff: hakkasid
     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Sg3+Aff: hakkas
     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Pl1+Aff: hakkasime
     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Pl2+Aff: hakkasite
     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Pl3+Aff: hakkasid
     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Neg: hakanud

     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Sg1+Aff: hakanuksin
     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Sg2+Aff: hakanuksid
     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Cond: hakanuks
     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Pl1+Aff: hakanuksime
     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Pl2+Aff: hakanuksite
     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Pl3+Aff: hakanuksid

     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Imprt: hakanud

     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Quot: hakanuvat

# Isikulised käändelised vormid # Personal infinite forms

     hakkama+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: hakkav
     hakkama+V+Pers+Past+Prc: hakanud

     hakkama+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: hakkama
     hakkama+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: hakkamas
     hakkama+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: hakkamast
     hakkama+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: hakkamaks
     hakkama+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: hakkamata

# Umbisikuline olevik # Impersonal present forms

     hakkama+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: hakatakse
     hakkama+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: hakata

     hakkama+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: hakataks

     hakkama+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: hakatagu

     hakkama+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: hakatavat

# Umbisikuline minevik # Impersonal past forms

     hakkama+V+Impers+Past+Ind+Aff: hakati
     hakkama+V+Impers+Past+Ind+Neg: hakatud

     hakkama+V+Impers+Past+Cond: hakatuks

     # hakkama+V+Impers+Past+Imprt: pole vormi # no form  
     # hakkama+V+Impers+Past+Quot: hakatuvat # pole võimalik moodustada # not possible
     
# Umbisikulised käändelised vormid # Impersonal infinite forms

     hakkama+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: hakatav
     hakkama+V+Impers+Past+Prc: hakatud

     hakkama+V+Impers+Sup: hakatama     

# Tegumoe kategooriata käändelised vormid # Infinite forms without voice category

     hakkama+V+Inf: hakata
     hakkama+V+Ger: hakates


# The verb forms list should be complete now
